Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1076.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Local Hire Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employer." A person that employs at least one worker on a public works project."Job order." The document containing the material terms and conditions of employment relating to wages, hours, working 123456789101112131415161718 conditions, worksite and other benefits."Local labor market." Every county in this Commonwealth and any county outside this Commonwealth if any portion of that county borders this Commonwealth."Maintenance work." The repair of an existing facility when the size, type or extent of the facility is not changed or increased."One-stop delivery system." The term shall mean the same as defined under section 103 of the act of December 18, 2001 (P.L.949, No.114), known as the Workforce Development Act."PA CareerLink® office." An entity established as part of the one-stop delivery system to provide workforce development services to individuals seeking employment."Primary residence." An individual's true, fixed, principal and permanent home to which the individual returns or intends to return, even if currently residing elsewhere. Presentation of a valid, government-issued identification card shall be conclusive proof of primary residence."Public body." The Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions, including:(1) any authority created by the General Assembly; or(2) any instrumentality or agency of the Commonwealth."Public works project." Construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair work other than maintenance work, done under contract and paid for in whole or in part out of the money of a public body where the estimated cost of the total project exceeds $500,000. The term does not include work performed under a rehabilitation or manpower training program."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry or their duly authorized deputy or representative.20260SB1076PN1378 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Worker." As follows:(1) The term includes a laborer, mechanic, skilled and semi-skilled laborer and apprentices employed by an employer and engaged in the performance of services directly upon the public works project, regardless of whether their work becomes a component part of the public works project.(2) The term does not include:(i) Material suppliers or their employees who do not perform services at the job site.(ii) Bona fide employees of a public body.(iii) Independent contractors who meet the requirements established in section 3 of the act of October 13, 2010 (P.L.506, No.72), known as the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act.(iv) Salaried supervisory personnel necessary to ensure efficient execution of the work."Work performed under a rehabilitation program." Work arranged by and at a State correctional institution primarily for teaching and upgrading the skills and employment opportunities of the inmates of the State correctional institution.Section 3. Local labor market utilization on public works projects.(a) Employer requirement.--At least 50% of workers for a public works project shall be hired from the local labor market, unless residency preference requirements are specifically prohibited by Federal law.(b) Duty of employer.--An employer unable to employ the minimum number of workers from the local labor market for a public works project shall inform the nearest PA CareerLink® 20260SB1076PN1378 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 office of the number of workers needed for the public works project and post a job order on the PA CareerLink® website.(c) Waiver.--(1) If, within three business days after a job order is posted under subsection (b), the PA CareerLink® office is unable to refer sufficient qualified job applicants to the employer, a staff member of the PA CareerLink® office shall notify the secretary, who shall issue a waiver to the employer stating the unavailability of applicants.(2) The waiver shall permit the employer to fill any open worker positions from outside the local labor market.(d) Waiver requirements.--(1) A waiver under subsection (c) shall be in writing and be issued within three business days after staff of the PA CareerLink® office notifies the secretary of the unavailability.(2) The waiver shall be provided to both the employer and the public body.(e) Contribution.--If an employer is granted a waiver under subsection (c), the employer shall be required to contribute an amount equal to the training fund contribution required by the collective bargaining agreement covering the specific classification of the worker at the location of the public works project for each worker covered by the waiver. The contribution shall be calculated by the number of hours worked multiplied by the training fund contribution rate per hour. Contributions shall be paid to the department and deposited into the Reemployment Fund established under section 601.5 of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law.20260SB1076PN1378 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Duty of employer.An employer shall keep an accurate record showing the name and primary residence of each worker employed on the public works project and the record shall be preserved for two years from the date of last employment. The record shall be open at all reasonable hours to the inspection of the public body awarding the contract and to the secretary.Section 5. Violations and penalties.(a) Duty of secretary.--If, after investigation, the secretary finds that an employer has violated this act, the secretary shall provide a written notice of the violation to the employer and the public body stating the number of violations, a description of each violation and the amount of penalty that will be imposed if violations continue.(b) Penalties.--(1) An employer who violates section 3 shall be subject to an administrative penalty of $250 per worker less than the required threshold of 50% per day of violation after receipt of notice of violation issued by the secretary. The administrative penalty shall terminate after compliance with the threshold or issuance of a waiver by the secretary.(2) An employer who violates section 4 shall be subject to an administrative penalty not to exceed $1,000 for the first violation and not to exceed $2,500 for each subsequent violation.(3) Actions taken under this section shall be subject to the provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).(4) All administrative penalties collected under this section shall be deposited into a restricted revenue account 20260SB1076PN1378 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the General Fund to be used for future enforcement of this act.Section 6. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement and administer this act.Section 7. Applicability.This act shall apply to public works projects advertised for bids on or after January 1, 2027.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1076PN1378 - 6 - 12345678910